Illinois, session 104th, HB4818.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act is amended 5by changing Sections 1-5 and 1-10 and by adding Sections 640-50, 40-55, 40-60, and 40-65 as follows: 7    (410 ILCS 705/1-5)8    Sec. 1-5. Findings. 9    (a) In the interest of allowing law enforcement to focus 10on violent and property crimes, generating revenue for 11education, substance abuse prevention and treatment, freeing 12public resources to invest in communities and other public 13purposes, and individual freedom, the General Assembly finds 14and declares that the use of cannabis should be legal for 15persons 21 years of age or older and should be taxed in a 16manner similar to alcohol.17    (b) In the interest of the health and public safety of the 18residents of Illinois, the General Assembly further finds and 19declares that cannabis should be regulated in a manner similar 20to alcohol so that:21        (1) persons will have to show proof of age before 22    purchasing cannabis;23        (2) selling, distributing, or transferring cannabis to   HB4818- 2 -LRB104 18149 BDA 31588 b1    minors and other persons under 21 years of age shall 2    remain illegal;3        (3) driving under the influence of cannabis, operating 4    a watercraft under the influence of cannabis, and 5    operating a snowmobile under the influence of cannabis 6    shall remain illegal;7        (4) legitimate, taxpaying business people, and not 8    criminal actors, will conduct sales of cannabis;9        (5) cannabis sold in this State will be tested, 10    labeled, and subject to additional regulation to ensure 11    that purchasers are informed and protected; and12        (6) purchasers will be informed of any known health 13    risks associated with the use of cannabis, as concluded by 14    evidence-based, peer reviewed research.15    (c) The General Assembly further finds and declares that 16it is necessary to ensure consistency and fairness in the 17application of this Act throughout the State and that, 18therefore, the matters addressed by this Act are, except as 19specified in this Act, matters of statewide concern.20    (d) The General Assembly further finds and declares that 21this Act shall not diminish the State's duties and commitment 22to seriously ill patients registered under the Compassionate 23Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act, nor alter the protections 24granted to them.25    (e) The General Assembly supports and encourages labor 26neutrality in the cannabis industry and further finds and   HB4818- 3 -LRB104 18149 BDA 31588 b1declares that employee workplace safety shall not be 2diminished and employer workplace policies shall be 3interpreted broadly to protect employee safety.4    (f) It is the intent of the General Assembly to reduce 5transportation inefficiencies, enhance statewide 6participation by social equity cannabis transporters, improve 7public safety, and maintain the highest standards of 8regulatory compliance while promoting fair market access and 9reduced environmental impact. 10(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19.) 11    (410 ILCS 705/1-10)12    Sec. 1-10. Definitions. In this Act:13    "Adult Use Cultivation Center License" means a license 14issued by the Department of Agriculture that permits a person 15to act as a cultivation center under this Act and any 16administrative rule made in furtherance of this Act.17    "Adult Use Dispensing Organization License" means a 18license issued by the Department of Financial and Professional 19Regulation that permits a person to act as a dispensing 20organization under this Act and any administrative rule made 21in furtherance of this Act.22    "Advertise" means to engage in promotional activities 23including, but not limited to: newspaper, radio, Internet and 24electronic media, and television advertising; the distribution 25of fliers and circulars; billboard advertising; and the   HB4818- 4 -LRB104 18149 BDA 31588 b1display of window and interior signs. "Advertise" does not 2mean exterior signage displaying only the name of the licensed 3cannabis business establishment. 4    "Application points" means the number of points a 5Dispensary Applicant receives on an application for a 6Conditional Adult Use Dispensing Organization License. 7    "BLS Region" means a region in Illinois used by the United 8States Bureau of Labor Statistics to gather and categorize 9certain employment and wage data. The 17 such regions in 10Illinois are: Bloomington, Cape Girardeau, Carbondale-Marion, 11Champaign-Urbana, Chicago-Naperville-Elgin, Danville, 12Davenport-Moline-Rock Island, Decatur, Kankakee, Peoria, 13Rockford, St. Louis, Springfield, Northwest Illinois 14nonmetropolitan area, West Central Illinois nonmetropolitan 15area, East Central Illinois nonmetropolitan area, and South 16Illinois nonmetropolitan area. 17    "By lot" means a randomized method of choosing between 2 18or more Eligible Tied Applicants or 2 or more Qualifying 19Applicants.20    "Cannabis" means marijuana, hashish, and other substances 21that are identified as including any parts of the plant 22Cannabis sativa and including derivatives or subspecies, such 23as indica, of all strains of cannabis, whether growing or not; 24the seeds thereof, the resin extracted from any part of the 25plant; and any compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, 26mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds, or resin,   HB4818- 5 -LRB104 18149 BDA 31588 b1including tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) and all other naturally 2produced cannabinol derivatives, whether produced directly or 3indirectly by extraction; however, "cannabis" does not include 4the mature stalks of the plant, fiber produced from the 5stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant, any other 6compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or 7preparation of the mature stalks (except the resin extracted 8from it), fiber, oil or cake, or the sterilized seed of the 9plant that is incapable of germination. "Cannabis" does not 10include industrial hemp as defined and authorized under the 11Industrial Hemp Act. "Cannabis" also means cannabis flower, 12concentrate, and cannabis-infused products.13    "Cannabis business establishment" means a cultivation 14center, craft grower, processing organization, infuser 15organization, dispensing organization, or transporting 16organization.17    "Cannabis concentrate" means a product derived from 18cannabis that is produced by extracting cannabinoids, 19including tetrahydrocannabinol (THC), from the plant through 20the use of propylene glycol, glycerin, butter, olive oil, or 21other typical cooking fats; water, ice, or dry ice; or butane, 22propane, CO2, ethanol, or isopropanol and with the intended 23use of smoking or making a cannabis-infused product. The use 24of any other solvent is expressly prohibited unless and until 25it is approved by the Department of Agriculture.26    "Cannabis container" means a sealed or resealable,   HB4818- 6 -LRB104 18149 BDA 31588 b1traceable, container, or package used for the purpose of 2containment of cannabis or cannabis-infused product during 3transportation.4    "Cannabis flower" means marijuana, hashish, and other 5substances that are identified as including any parts of the 6plant Cannabis sativa and including derivatives or subspecies, 7such as indica, of all strains of cannabis; including raw 8kief, leaves, and buds, but not resin that has been extracted 9from any part of such plant; nor any compound, manufacture, 10salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of such plant, its 11seeds, or resin.12    "Cannabis-infused product" means a beverage, food, oil, 13ointment, tincture, topical formulation, or another product 14containing cannabis or cannabis concentrate that is not 15intended to be smoked.16    "Cannabis paraphernalia" means equipment, products, or 17materials intended to be used for planting, propagating, 18cultivating, growing, harvesting, manufacturing, producing, 19processing, preparing, testing, analyzing, packaging, 20repackaging, storing, containing, concealing, ingesting, or 21otherwise introducing cannabis into the human body. 22    "Cannabis plant monitoring system" or "plant monitoring 23system" means a system that includes, but is not limited to, 24testing and data collection established and maintained by the 25cultivation center, craft grower, or processing organization 26and that is available to the Department of Revenue, the   HB4818- 7 -LRB104 18149 BDA 31588 b1Department of Agriculture, the Department of Financial and 2Professional Regulation, and the Illinois State Police for the 3purposes of documenting each cannabis plant and monitoring 4plant development throughout the life cycle of a cannabis 5plant cultivated for the intended use by a customer from seed 6planting to final packaging.7    "Cannabis testing facility" means an entity registered by 8the Department of Agriculture to test cannabis for potency and 9contaminants.10    "Clone" means a plant section from a female cannabis plant 11not yet rootbound, growing in a water solution or other 12propagation matrix, that is capable of developing into a new 13plant.14    "Community College Cannabis Vocational Training Pilot 15Program faculty participant" means a person who is 21 years of 16age or older, licensed by the Department of Agriculture, and 17is employed or contracted by an Illinois community college to 18provide student instruction using cannabis plants at an 19Illinois Community College.20    "Community College Cannabis Vocational Training Pilot 21Program faculty participant Agent Identification Card" means a 22document issued by the Department of Agriculture that 23identifies a person as a Community College Cannabis Vocational 24Training Pilot Program faculty participant.25    "Conditional Adult Use Dispensing Organization License" 26means a contingent license awarded to applicants for an Adult   HB4818- 8 -LRB104 18149 BDA 31588 b1Use Dispensing Organization License that reserves the right to 2an Adult Use Dispensing Organization License if the applicant 3meets certain conditions described in this Act, but does not 4entitle the recipient to begin purchasing or selling cannabis 5or cannabis-infused products.6    "Conditional Adult Use Cultivation Center License" means a 7license awarded to top-scoring applicants for an Adult Use 8Cultivation Center License that reserves the right to an Adult 9Use Cultivation Center License if the applicant meets certain 10conditions as determined by the Department of Agriculture by 11rule, but does not entitle the recipient to begin growing, 12processing, or selling cannabis or cannabis-infused products.13    "Craft grower" means a facility operated by an 14organization or business that is licensed by the Department of 15Agriculture to cultivate, dry, cure, and package cannabis and 16perform other necessary activities to make cannabis available 17for sale at a dispensing organization or use at a processing 18organization. A craft grower may contain up to 5,000 square 19feet of canopy space on its premises for plants in the 20flowering state. The Department of Agriculture may authorize 21an increase or decrease of flowering stage cultivation space 22in increments of 3,000 square feet by rule based on market 23need, craft grower capacity, and the licensee's history of 24compliance or noncompliance, with a maximum space of 14,000 25square feet for cultivating plants in the flowering stage, 26which must be cultivated in all stages of growth in an enclosed   HB4818- 9 -LRB104 18149 BDA 31588 b1and secure area. A craft grower may share premises with a 2processing organization or a dispensing organization, or both, 3provided each licensee stores currency and cannabis or 4cannabis-infused products in a separate secured vault to which 5the other licensee does not have access or all licensees 6sharing a vault share more than 50% of the same ownership. 7    "Craft grower agent" means a principal officer, board 8member, employee, or other agent of a craft grower who is 21 9years of age or older.10    "Craft Grower Agent Identification Card" means a document 11issued by the Department of Agriculture that identifies a 12person as a craft grower agent.13    "Cultivation center" means a facility operated by an 14organization or business that is licensed by the Department of 15Agriculture to cultivate, process, transport (unless otherwise 16limited by this Act), and perform other necessary activities 17to provide cannabis and cannabis-infused products to cannabis 18business establishments.19    "Cultivation center agent" means a principal officer, 20board member, employee, or other agent of a cultivation center 21who is 21 years of age or older.22    "Cultivation Center Agent Identification Card" means a 23document issued by the Department of Agriculture that 24identifies a person as a cultivation center agent.25    "Currency" means currency and coin of the United States.26    "Dispensary" means a facility operated by a dispensing   HB4818- 10 -LRB104 18149 BDA 31588 b1organization at which activities licensed by this Act may 2occur.3    "Dispensary Applicant" means the Proposed Dispensing 4Organization Name as stated on an application for a 5Conditional Adult Use Dispensing Organization License. 6    "Dispensing organization" means a facility operated by an 7organization or business that is licensed by the Department of 8Financial and Professional Regulation to acquire cannabis from 9a cultivation center, craft grower, processing organization, 10or another dispensary for the purpose of selling or dispensing 11cannabis, cannabis-infused products, cannabis seeds, 12paraphernalia, or related supplies under this Act to 13purchasers or to qualified registered medical cannabis 14patients and caregivers. As used in this Act, "dispensing 15organization" includes a registered medical cannabis 16organization as defined in the Compassionate Use of Medical 17Cannabis Program Act or its successor Act that has obtained an 18Early Approval Adult Use Dispensing Organization License.19    "Dispensing organization agent" means a principal officer, 20employee, or agent of a dispensing organization who is 21 21years of age or older.22    "Dispensing organization agent identification card" means 23a document issued by the Department of Financial and 24Professional Regulation that identifies a person as a 25dispensing organization agent.26    "Disproportionately Impacted Area" means a census tract or   HB4818- 11 -LRB104 18149 BDA 31588 b1comparable geographic area that satisfies the following 2criteria as determined by the Department of Commerce and 3Economic Opportunity, that: 4        (1) meets at least one of the following criteria: 5            (A) the area has a poverty rate of at least 20% 6        according to the latest federal decennial census; or 7            (B) 75% or more of the children in the area 8        participate in the federal free lunch program 9        according to reported statistics from the State Board 10        of Education; or 11            (C) at least 20% of the households in the area 12        receive assistance under the Supplemental Nutrition 13        Assistance Program; or14            (D) the area has an average unemployment rate, as 15        determined by the Illinois Department of Employment 16        Security, that is more than 120% of the national 17        unemployment average, as determined by the United 18        States Department of Labor, for a period of at least 2 19        consecutive calendar years preceding the date of the 20        application; and 21        (2) has high rates of arrest, conviction, and 22    incarceration related to the sale, possession, use, 23    cultivation, manufacture, or transport of cannabis.24    "Early Approval Adult Use Cultivation Center License" 25means a license that permits a medical cannabis cultivation 26center licensed under the Compassionate Use of Medical   HB4818- 12 -LRB104 18149 BDA 31588 b1Cannabis Program Act as of the effective date of this Act to 2begin cultivating, infusing, packaging, transporting (unless 3otherwise provided in this Act), processing, and selling 4cannabis or cannabis-infused product to cannabis business 5establishments for resale to purchasers as permitted by this 6Act as of January 1, 2020.7    "Early Approval Adult Use Dispensing Organization License" 8means a license that permits a medical cannabis dispensing 9organization licensed under the Compassionate Use of Medical 10Cannabis Program Act as of the effective date of this Act to 11begin selling cannabis or cannabis-infused product to 12purchasers as permitted by this Act as of January 1, 2020.13    "Early Approval Adult Use Dispensing Organization at a 14secondary site" means a license that permits a medical 15cannabis dispensing organization licensed under the 16Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act as of the 17effective date of this Act to begin selling cannabis or 18cannabis-infused product to purchasers as permitted by this 19Act on January 1, 2020 at a different dispensary location from 20its existing registered medical dispensary location.21    "Eligible Tied Applicant" means a Tied Applicant that is 22eligible to participate in the process by which a remaining 23available license is distributed by lot pursuant to a Tied 24Applicant Lottery. 25    "Enclosed, locked facility" means a room, greenhouse, 26building, or other enclosed area equipped with locks or other   HB4818- 13 -LRB104 18149 BDA 31588 b1security devices that permit access only by cannabis business 2establishment agents working for the licensed cannabis 3business establishment or acting pursuant to this Act to 4cultivate, process, store, or distribute cannabis.5    "Enclosed, locked space" means a closet, room, greenhouse, 6building, or other enclosed area equipped with locks or other 7security devices that permit access only by authorized 8individuals under this Act. "Enclosed, locked space" may 9include:10        (1) a space within a residential building that (i) is 11    the primary residence of the individual cultivating 5 or 12    fewer cannabis plants that are more than 5 inches tall and 13    (ii) includes sleeping quarters and indoor plumbing. The 14    space must only be accessible by a key or code that is 15    different from any key or code that can be used to access 16    the residential building from the exterior; or17        (2) a structure, such as a shed or greenhouse, that 18    lies on the same plot of land as a residential building 19    that (i) includes sleeping quarters and indoor plumbing 20    and (ii) is used as a primary residence by the person 21    cultivating 5 or fewer cannabis plants that are more than 22    5 inches tall, such as a shed or greenhouse. The structure 23    must remain locked when it is unoccupied by people. 24    "Financial institution" has the same meaning as "financial 25organization" as defined in Section 1501 of the Illinois 26Income Tax Act, and also includes the holding companies,   HB4818- 14 -LRB104 18149 BDA 31588 b1subsidiaries, and affiliates of such financial organizations. 2    "Flowering stage" means the stage of cultivation where and 3when a cannabis plant is cultivated to produce plant material 4for cannabis products. This includes mature plants as follows:5        (1) if greater than 2 stigmas are visible at each 6    internode of the plant; or7        (2) if the cannabis plant is in an area that has been 8    intentionally deprived of light for a period of time 9    intended to produce flower buds and induce maturation, 10    from the moment the light deprivation began through the 11    remainder of the marijuana plant growth cycle.12    "Individual" means a natural person.13    "Infuser organization" or "infuser" means a facility 14operated by an organization or business that is licensed by 15the Department of Agriculture to directly incorporate cannabis 16or cannabis concentrate into a product formulation to produce 17a cannabis-infused product. 18    "Kief" means the resinous crystal-like trichomes that are 19found on cannabis and that are accumulated, resulting in a 20higher concentration of cannabinoids, untreated by heat or 21pressure, or extracted using a solvent. 22    "Labor peace agreement" means an agreement between a 23cannabis business establishment and any labor organization 24recognized under the National Labor Relations Act, referred to 25in this Act as a bona fide labor organization, that prohibits 26labor organizations and members from engaging in picketing,   HB4818- 15 -LRB104 18149 BDA 31588 b1work stoppages, boycotts, and any other economic interference 2with the cannabis business establishment. This agreement means 3that the cannabis business establishment has agreed not to 4disrupt efforts by the bona fide labor organization to 5communicate with, and attempt to organize and represent, the 6cannabis business establishment's employees. The agreement 7shall provide a bona fide labor organization access at 8reasonable times to areas in which the cannabis business 9establishment's employees work, for the purpose of meeting 10with employees to discuss their right to representation, 11employment rights under State law, and terms and conditions of 12employment. This type of agreement shall not mandate a 13particular method of election or certification of the bona 14fide labor organization.15    "Limited access area" means a room or other area under the 16control of a cannabis dispensing organization licensed under 17this Act and upon the licensed premises where cannabis sales 18occur with access limited to purchasers, dispensing 19organization owners and other dispensing organization agents, 20or service professionals conducting business with the 21dispensing organization, or, if sales to registered qualifying 22patients, caregivers, provisional patients, and Opioid 23Alternative Pilot Program participants licensed pursuant to 24the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act are also 25permitted at the dispensary, registered qualifying patients, 26caregivers, provisional patients, and Opioid Alternative Pilot   HB4818- 16 -LRB104 18149 BDA 31588 b1Program participants. 2    "Member of an impacted family" means an individual who has 3a parent, legal guardian, child, spouse, or dependent, or was 4a dependent of an individual who, prior to the effective date 5of this Act, was arrested for, convicted of, or adjudicated 6delinquent for any offense that is eligible for expungement 7under this Act.8    "Mother plant" means a cannabis plant that is cultivated 9or maintained for the purpose of generating clones, and that 10will not be used to produce plant material for sale to an 11infuser or dispensing organization.12    "Ordinary public view" means within the sight line with 13normal visual range of a person, unassisted by visual aids, 14from a public street or sidewalk adjacent to real property, or 15from within an adjacent property. 16    "Ownership and control" means ownership of at least 51% of 17the business, including corporate stock if a corporation, and 18control over the management and day-to-day operations of the 19business and an interest in the capital, assets, and profits 20and losses of the business proportionate to percentage of 21ownership.22    "Person" means a natural individual, firm, partnership, 23association, joint stock company, joint venture, public or 24private corporation, limited liability company, or a receiver, 25executor, trustee, guardian, or other representative appointed 26by order of any court.  HB4818- 17 -LRB104 18149 BDA 31588 b1    "Possession limit" means the amount of cannabis under 2Section 10-10 that may be possessed at any one time by a person 321 years of age or older or who is a registered qualifying 4medical cannabis patient or caregiver under the Compassionate 5Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act.6    "Principal officer" includes a cannabis business 7establishment applicant or licensed cannabis business 8establishment's board member, owner with more than 1% interest 9of the total cannabis business establishment or more than 5% 10interest of the total cannabis business establishment of a 11publicly traded company, president, vice president, secretary, 12treasurer, partner, officer, member, manager member, or person 13with a profit sharing, financial interest, or revenue sharing 14arrangement. The definition includes a person with authority 15to control the cannabis business establishment, a person who 16assumes responsibility for the debts of the cannabis business 17establishment and who is further defined in this Act.18    "Primary residence" means a dwelling where a person 19usually stays or stays more often than other locations. It may 20be determined by, without limitation, presence, tax filings; 21address on an Illinois driver's license, an Illinois 22Identification Card, or an Illinois Person with a Disability 23Identification Card; or voter registration. No person may have 24more than one primary residence.25    "Processing organization" or "processor" means a facility 26operated by an organization or business that is licensed by   HB4818- 18 -LRB104 18149 BDA 31588 b1the Department of Agriculture to either extract constituent 2chemicals or compounds to produce cannabis concentrate or 3incorporate cannabis or cannabis concentrate into a product 4formulation to produce a cannabis product. 5    "Processing organization agent" means a principal officer, 6board member, employee, or agent of a processing organization.7    "Processing organization agent identification card" means 8a document issued by the Department of Agriculture that 9identifies a person as a processing organization agent.10    "Purchaser" means a person 21 years of age or older who 11acquires cannabis for a valuable consideration. "Purchaser" 12does not include a cardholder under the Compassionate Use of 13Medical Cannabis Program Act.14    "Qualifying Applicant" means an applicant that submitted 15an application pursuant to Section 15-30 that received at 16least 85% of 250 application points available under Section 1715-30 as the applicant's final score and meets the definition 18of "Social Equity Applicant" as set forth under this Section.19    "Qualifying Social Equity Justice Involved Applicant" 20means an applicant that submitted an application pursuant to 21Section 15-30 that received at least 85% of 250 application 22points available under Section 15-30 as the applicant's final 23score and meets the criteria of either paragraph (1) or (2) of 24the definition of "Social Equity Applicant" as set forth under 25this Section. 26    "Qualified Social Equity Applicant" means a Social Equity   HB4818- 19 -LRB104 18149 BDA 31588 b1Applicant who has been awarded a conditional license under 2this Act to operate a cannabis business establishment.3    "Resided" means an individual's primary residence was 4located within the relevant geographic area as established by 52 of the following:6        (1) a signed lease agreement that includes the 7    applicant's name;8        (2) a property deed that includes the applicant's 9    name;10        (3) school records;11        (4) a voter registration card;12        (5) an Illinois driver's license, an Illinois 13    Identification Card, or an Illinois Person with a 14    Disability Identification Card;15        (6) a paycheck stub; 16        (7) a utility bill; 17        (8) tax records; or18        (9) any other proof of residency or other information 19    necessary to establish residence as provided by rule.20    "Smoking" means the inhalation of smoke caused by the 21combustion of cannabis.22    "Social Equity Applicant" means an applicant that is an 23Illinois resident that meets one of the following criteria:24        (1) an applicant with at least 51% ownership and 25    control by one or more individuals who have resided for at 26    least 5 of the preceding 10 years in a Disproportionately   HB4818- 20 -LRB104 18149 BDA 31588 b1    Impacted Area; 2        (2) an applicant with at least 51% ownership and 3    control by one or more individuals who: 4            (i) have been arrested for, convicted of, or 5        adjudicated delinquent for any offense that is 6        eligible for expungement under this Act; or 7            (ii) is a member of an impacted family;8        (3) for applicants with a minimum of 10 full-time 9    employees, an applicant with at least 51% of current 10    employees who:11            (i) currently reside in a Disproportionately 12        Impacted Area; or13            (ii) have been arrested for, convicted of, or 14        adjudicated delinquent for any offense that is 15        eligible for expungement under this Act or member of 16        an impacted family.17    Nothing in this Act shall be construed to preempt or limit 18the duties of any employer under the Job Opportunities for 19Qualified Applicants Act. Nothing in this Act shall permit an 20employer to require an employee to disclose sealed or expunged 21offenses, unless otherwise required by law.22    "Tied Applicant" means an application submitted by a 23Dispensary Applicant pursuant to Section 15-30 that received 24the same number of application points under Section 15-30 as 25the Dispensary Applicant's final score as one or more 26top-scoring applications in the same BLS Region and would have   HB4818- 21 -LRB104 18149 BDA 31588 b1been awarded a license but for the one or more other 2top-scoring applications that received the same number of 3application points. Each application for which a Dispensary 4Applicant was required to pay a required application fee for 5the application period ending January 2, 2020 shall be 6considered an application of a separate Tied Applicant.7    "Tied Applicant Lottery" means the process established 8under 68 Ill. Adm. Code 1291.50 for awarding Conditional Adult 9Use Dispensing Organization Licenses pursuant to Sections 1015-25 and 15-30 among Eligible Tied Applicants. 11    "Tincture" means a cannabis-infused solution, typically 12comprised of alcohol, glycerin, or vegetable oils, derived 13either directly from the cannabis plant or from a processed 14cannabis extract. A tincture is not an alcoholic liquor as 15defined in the Liquor Control Act of 1934. A tincture shall 16include a calibrated dropper or other similar device capable 17of accurately measuring servings.18    Transfer site" means a secure, non-retail facility 19operated by a licensed cannabis transporter holding a transfer 20site endorsement for the short-term storage, consolidation, 21and logistical movement of cannabis or cannabis-infused 22products, as authorized under Section 1-10.5.23    "Transfer site endorsement" means an authorization issued 24by the Department of Agriculture permitting an eligible social 25equity cannabis transporter to operate one or more transfer 26sites in accordance with this Act and rules adopted under it.   HB4818- 22 -LRB104 18149 BDA 31588 b1    "Transporting organization" or "transporter" means an 2organization or business that is licensed by the Department of 3Agriculture to transport cannabis or cannabis-infused product 4on behalf of a cannabis business establishment or a community 5college licensed under the Community College Cannabis 6Vocational Training Pilot Program. 7    "Transporting organization agent" means a principal 8officer, board member, employee, or agent of a transporting 9organization.10    "Transporting organization agent identification card" 11means a document issued by the Department of Agriculture that 12identifies a person as a transporting organization agent.13    "Unit of local government" means any county, city, 14village, or incorporated town.15    "Vegetative stage" means the stage of cultivation in which 16a cannabis plant is propagated to produce additional cannabis 17plants or reach a sufficient size for production. This 18includes seedlings, clones, mothers, and other immature 19cannabis plants as follows: 20        (1) if the cannabis plant is in an area that has not 21    been intentionally deprived of light for a period of time 22    intended to produce flower buds and induce maturation, it 23    has no more than 2 stigmas visible at each internode of the 24    cannabis plant; or 25        (2) any cannabis plant that is cultivated solely for 26    the purpose of propagating clones and is never used to   HB4818- 23 -LRB104 18149 BDA 31588 b1    produce cannabis.2(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19; 3102-98, eff. 7-15-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 45-13-22.) 5    (410 ILCS 705/40-50 new)6    Sec. 40-50. Transfer site endorsement.7    (a) The Department of Agriculture shall establish a 8transfer site endorsement for licensed cannabis transporters 9that have been awarded a social equity designation under this 10Act. The endorsement shall authorize the transporter to own 11and operate one or more secure, approved cannabis transfer 12sites for the limited purpose of short-term storage and 13logistical consolidation of cannabis or cannabis-infused 14products.15    (b) A transfer site may be used solely for:16        (1) temporary storage of cannabis or cannabis-infused 17    products for a period not to exceed 7 calendar days;18        (2) consolidation or aggregation of cannabis or 19    cannabis-infused products from multiple licensed 20    cultivation centers, craft growers, infusers, or 21    transporters into compliant outbound shipments; and22        (3) secure handling of cannabis or cannabis-infused 23    products rejected by a dispensing organization or other 24    licensee, pending lawful return, redistribution, or other 25    disposition as authorized by rule.  HB4818- 24 -LRB104 18149 BDA 31588 b1    (c) All cannabis or cannabis-infused products received, 2stored, or dispatched at a transfer site shall remain subject 3to full seed-to-sale tracking requirements and shall be logged 4in the State's cannabis tracking system at receipt and 5dispatch.6    (d) A transfer site endorsement does not authorize retail 7sales, processing, repackaging, relabeling, or alteration of 8cannabis or cannabis-infused products.9    (e) A transporter holding a transfer site endorsement may 10operate up to 5 transfer sites statewide, subject to 11geographic and population-based distribution criteria 12established by the Department by rule. In establishing such 13criteria, the Department shall consider county population, 14regional demographics, market access, and the prevention of 15excessive concentration in any single area of the State.16    (f) Ownership and operation of a transfer site shall be 17limited to transporters holding a social equity designation 18under this Act. Up to 50% of the operational capacity of each 19transfer site shall be reserved for use by other social equity 20transport license holders that do not operate their own 21transfer sites. Reasonable fees may be charged for storage and 22utilization to recover associated costs, as permitted by rule.23    (g) Cannabis or cannabis-infused products from multiple 24licensed entities may be aggregated at a transfer site into 25consolidated outbound shipments, provided that all such 26activity complies with chain-of-custody, security, and   HB4818- 25 -LRB104 18149 BDA 31588 b1tracking requirements.  2    (410 ILCS 705/40-55 new)3    Sec. 40-55. Security, compliance, and insurance for 4transfer sites.5    (a) Transfer sites shall comply with heightened security 6requirements, including 24-hour video surveillance, alarm 7systems, controlled access points, and secure storage 8protocols, as established by rule.9    (b) Transfer site operators shall maintain insurance 10coverage, in amounts and forms established by rule, sufficient 11to cover cannabis or cannabis-infused products stored at the 12site and in transit.13    (c) The Department of Agriculture, in coordination with 14the Illinois State Police, may conduct inspections, audits, 15and investigations of transfer sites and endorsed transporters 16and may impose disciplinary action or penalties under this Act 17for violations.  18    (410 ILCS 705/40-60 new)19    Sec. 40-60. Local zoning and coordination.20    (a) Issuance or renewal of a transfer site endorsement 21shall be conditioned upon compliance with applicable local 22zoning and land-use requirements.23    (b) The Department shall coordinate with units of local 24government regarding transfer site approval, complaint intake,   HB4818- 26 -LRB104 18149 BDA 31588 b1and enforcement actions.  2    (410 ILCS 705/40-65 new)3    Sec. 40-65. Rulemaking. The Department of Agriculture 4shall adopt rules necessary to implement the transfer site 5endorsement, including application and renewal procedures, 6operational and security standards, reporting and audit 7requirements, procedures for handling rejected cannabis or 8cannabis-infused products, and social equity preference 9criteria.